Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.260

Revocation of letters—Proceedings in court or chambers.

The applications and acts authorized by RCW 11.28.250 may be heard and determined in court or at chambers. All orders made therein must be entered upon the minutes of the court.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.28.260. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 75; RRS s 1445; prior: 1891 p 384 s 17; Code 1881 s 1413; 1877 p 213 s 4.]